apertium-sco.sco.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
    Dictionary:
    Sections: 1
    Entries: 6147
    Sdefs: 95
    Paradigms: 82
    Last processed by: apertium-dixtools format -alignMonodix ../apertium-sco/apertium-sco.sco.dix ../apertium-sco/apertium-sco.sco.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="prenom" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="email" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="url" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="sym" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="mon" /> 
    <sdef n="unc"   c="Uncountable"/> 
    <sdef n="dim"   c="Diminutive"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>



<pardef n="acause__cnjadv">
    <e>     <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="'s__gen">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="’s__gen">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="uuml">
  <e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ouml">
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="na__S">
  <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l><r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>        <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nae</l>       <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>naw</l>       <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="verra__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Mark__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Mary__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Linux__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eneuch__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="three__num">
    <e>     <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>           


<pardef n="A__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef> 
<pardef n="ye__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef> 


<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>A</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ah</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
  <e>       <p><l>I</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
  <e>       <p><l>ye</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>he</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>she</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="Southern"><p><l>shi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hit</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>thay</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>they</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="probj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ye</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>you</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>him</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>her</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hit</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hus</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>thaim</l>     <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="prsubj">          <i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="probj">           <i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="acause">          <i>acause</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="afore">           <i>afore</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="altho">           <i>altho</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="as">              <i>as</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="awtho">           <i>awtho</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="because">         <i>because</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="gin">             <i>gin</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="gin">      <i>if</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="sae">             <i>sae</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="whan">            <i>whan</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="whiles">          <i>whiles</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="withoot">         <i>withoot</i><par n="acause__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="eneuch">          <i>eneuch</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="ilk">             <i>ilk</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="ilka">            <i>ilka</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="mair">            <i>mair</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="maist">           <i>maist</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="some">            <i>some</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
<e lm="ye">              <i>ye</i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ye">              <i>ye</i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="verra">           <i>verra</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="mair">            <i>mair</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="maist">           <i>maist</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="Aiberdeen">       <i>Aiberdeen</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Albany">          <i>Albany</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Australie">       <i>Australie</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Capitol">         <i>Capitol</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Erlan">           <i>Erlan</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Franse">          <i>Franse</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="German Ocean">    <i>German<b/>Ocean</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Halyruid">        <i>Halyruid</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ireland">         <i>Ireland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Northren Ireland"><i>Northren<b/>Ireland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roushie">         <i>Roushie</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Unitit Kinrick">  <i>Unitit<b/>Kinrick</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wastmeenster">    <i>Wastmeenster</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Polis Scotland">  <i>Polis<b/>Scotland</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wikipædia">       <i>Wikipædia</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alomías">         <i>Alomías</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arquimbaldo">     <i>Arquimbaldo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Burns">           <i>Burns</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Daian">           <i>Daian</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ever">            <i>Ever</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Indalecio">       <i>Indalecio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marino">          <i>Marino</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Platón">          <i>Platón</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vigilio">         <i>Vigilio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Clay">            <i>Clay</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hudson">          <i>Hudson</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marlon">          <i>Marlon</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Trenton">         <i>Trenton</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen Trumpf">   <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen">          <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tönis">           <i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balulde">         <i>Balulde</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cebele">          <i>Cebele</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edel">            <i>Edel</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gioia">           <i>Gioia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Indamira">        <i>Indamira</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Katya">           <i>Katya</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Neri">            <i>Neri</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Salustia">        <i>Salustia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Waltruda">        <i>Waltruda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bianca">          <i>Bianca</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Holly">           <i>Holly</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lizbeth">         <i>Lizbeth</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sienna">          <i>Sienna</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="'s">              <i>'s</i><par n="'s__gen"/></e>
<e lm="’s">              <i>’s</i><par n="’s__gen"/></e>
